Maryland, session 2025, SB0815.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
1–209.
(a) (1) In this section, “department” means[:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0815*

SENATE BILL 815
(i) the Department of Agriculture;
(ii) the Department of the Environment;
(iii) the Maryland Department of Health;
(iv) the Department of Human Services;
(v)] the Maryland Department of Labor[; or
(vi) the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services].
(2) “Department” includes any unit of a department specified in paragraph
(1) of this subsection ONLY THE FOLLOWING UNITS IN THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT
OF LABOR:
(I) THE STATE BOARD OF BARBERS; AND
(II) THE STATE BOARD OF COSMETOLOGISTS.
[(b) This section does not apply to a person who was previously convicted of a crime
of violence, as defined in § 14–101 of the Criminal Law Article.]
[(c)] (B) It is the policy of the State to encourage the employment of [nonviolent]
ex–offenders and remove barriers to their ability to demonstrate fitness for occupational
licenses or certifications required by the State.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT REQUIRE AN APPLICANT FOR AN
OCCUPATIONAL LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE TO DISCLOSE AS A PART OF AN
APPLICATION:
(1) ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:
(I) A DEFERRED ADJUDICATION;
(II) PARTICIPATION IN A DIVERSION PROGRAM; OR
(III) AN ARREST NOT FOLLOWED BY A CONVICTION;
(2) A CONVICTION FOR WHICH NO TERM OF IMPRISONMENT MAY BE
IMPOSED;
(3) A CONVICTION THAT HAS BEEN SEALED, VACATED, DISMISSED,
EXPUNGED, OR PARDONED;

SENATE BILL 815 3
(4) AN ADJUDICATION OF A DELINQUENT ACT AS A JUVENILE;
(5) A CONVICTION FOR A MISDEMEANOR THAT DID NOT INVOLVE
PHYSICAL HARM TO ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL;
(6) A CONVICTION FOR WHICH A PERIOD OF 3 YEARS HAS PASSED
SINCE THE APPLICANT COMPLETED SERVING THE APPLICANT’S SENTENCE IF THE
SENTENCE DID NOT INCLUDE A TERM OF IMPRISONMENT; OR
(7) UNLESS THE CONVICTION WAS FOR A CRIME OF VIOLENCE AS
DEFINED IN § 14–101 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE, A CONVICTION FOR WHICH
A PERIOD OF 3 YEARS HAS PASSED SINCE THE END OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S TERM OF
IMPRISONMENT, UNLESS THE CONVICTION WAS FOR:
(I) A CRIME OF VIOLENCE AS DEFINED IN § 14–101 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE; OR
(II) FRAUD OR A RELATED CRIME UNDER TITLE 8 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(d) [Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, a] THE department may
not deny an occupational license or certificate to an applicant solely on the basis that the
applicant has previously been convicted of a crime, unless the department determines that:
(1) there is a direct relationship between the applicant’s previous
conviction and the specific occupational license or certificate sought; or
(2) the issuance of the license or certificate would involve [an unreasonable
risk to property or to the safety or welfare of specific individuals or the general public] A
DIRECT AND SUBSTANTIAL THREAT TO PUBLIC SAFETY OR SPECIFIC INDIVIDUALS
OR PROPERTY.
(e) In making the determination under subsection (d) of this section, the
department shall consider:
(1) the policy of the State expressed in subsection [(c)] (B) of this section;
(2) the specific duties and responsibilities required of a licensee or
certificate holder;
(3) whether the applicant’s previous conviction has any impact on the
applicant’s fitness or ability to perform the duties and responsibilities authorized by the
license or certificate;

SENATE BILL 815
(4) the age of the applicant at the time of the conviction and the amount of
time that has elapsed since the conviction;
(5) the seriousness of the offense for which the applicant was convicted;
(6) THE APPLICANT’S EDUCATION, TRAINING, AND EMPLOYMENT
HISTORY BEFORE, DURING, AND AFTER THE APPLICANT’S TERM OF IMPRISONMENT;
(7) WHETHER THE OCCUPATIONAL LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE
REQUIRES THE APPLICANT TO BE BONDED;
[(6)] (8) other information provided by the applicant or on the applicant’s
behalf with regard to the applicant’s rehabilitation and good conduct; and
[(7)] (9) the legitimate interest of the department in protecting property
and the safety and welfare of specific individuals or the general public.
(f) (1) This subsection does not apply to a conviction of a crime for which
registration on the sex offender registry is required under Title 11, Subtitle 7 of this article.
(2) If a period of 7 years or more has passed since an applicant completed
serving the sentence for a crime, including all imprisonment, mandatory supervision,
probation, and parole, and the applicant has not been charged with another crime other
than a minor traffic violation, as defined in § 10–101 of this article, during that time, [a]
THE department may not deny an occupational license or certificate to the applicant solely
on the basis that the applicant was previously convicted of the crime.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.